Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.050

Composition of board—Election of commissioners—Terms—Vacancies.

(1) The resolution or petition submitting the ballot proposition shall designate the composition of the board of metropolitan park commissioners from among the alternatives provided under subsections (2) through (4) of this section. The ballot proposition shall clearly describe the designated composition of the board.

(2) The commissioners of the district may be selected by election, in which case at the same election at which the proposition is submitted to the voters as to whether a metropolitan park district is to be formed, five park commissioners shall be elected. The election of park commissioners shall be null and void if the metropolitan park district is not created. Candidates shall run for specific commission positions. No primary shall be held to nominate candidates. The person receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be elected as a commissioner. The staggering of the terms of office shall occur as follows: (a) The two persons who are elected receiving the two greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to six-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or five-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (b) the two persons who are elected receiving the next two greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or three-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (c) the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial commissioners shall take office immediately when they are elected and qualified, and for purposes of computing their terms of office the terms shall be assumed to commence on the first day of January in the year after they are elected. Thereafter, all commissioners shall be elected to six-year terms of office. All commissioners shall serve until their respective successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29A.60.280. Vacancies shall occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

(3) In a district wholly located within a city or within the unincorporated area of a county, the governing body of such city or legislative authority of such county may be designated to serve in an ex officio capacity as the board of metropolitan park commissioners, provided that when creation of the district is proposed by citizen petition, the city or county approves by resolution such designation.

(4) Where the proposed district is located within more than one city, more than one county, or any combination of cities and counties, each city governing body and county legislative authority may be designated to collectively serve ex officio as the board of metropolitan park commissioners through selection of one or more members from each to serve as the board, provided that when creation of the district is proposed by citizen petition, each city governing body and county legislative authority approve by resolution such designation. Within six months of the date of certification of election results approving creation of the district, the size and membership of the board shall be determined through interlocal agreement of each city and county. The interlocal agreement shall specify the method for filling vacancies on the board.

(5) Metropolitan park districts created by a vote of the people prior to June 13, 2002, may not change the composition and method of selection of their governing authority without approval of the voters. Should such a change be desired, the board of park commissioners shall submit a ballot proposition to the voters of the metropolitan park district.

[ 2015 c 53 s 44; 2002 c 88 s 5; 1994 c 223 s 23; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 24; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.050. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-3, part; prior: 1909 c 131 s 2; 1907 c 98 s 3, part; RRS s 6722, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).